Nebraska, session 109, LB1232.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1232 LB1232
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 37-455, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
37-455 (1) The commission may issue a limited permit for deer,
antelope, wild turkey, or elk, or mountain lion to a person who is a
qualifying landowner or leaseholder or a member of such person's
immediate family as described in this section. The commission may issue
nonresident landowner limited permits after preference has been given for
the issuance of resident permits as provided in rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the commission. Except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section, a permit shall be valid during the
predetermined period established by the commission pursuant to sections
37-447 to 37-450, 37-452, 37-456, or 37-457. Upon receipt of an
application in proper form as prescribed by the rules and regulations of
the commission, the commission may issue (a) a limited deer, antelope, or
wild turkey permit valid for hunting on all of the land which is owned or
leased by the qualifying landowner or leaseholder if such lands are
identified in the application or (b) a limited elk or mountain lion
permit valid for hunting on the entire elk or mountain lion management
unit of which the land of the qualifying landowner or leaseholder
included in the application is a part.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations prescribing procedures and forms and create requirements for
documentation by an applicant or permittee to determine whether the
applicant or permittee is a Nebraska resident and is a qualifying
landowner or leaseholder of the described property or is a member of the
immediate family of such qualifying landowner or leaseholder. The
commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that create
requirements for documentation to designate one qualifying landowner
among partners of a partnership or officers or shareholders of a
corporation that owns or leases eighty acres or more of farm or ranch
land for agricultural purposes and among beneficiaries of a trust that
-2-

LB1232 LB1232
2026 2026
owns or leases eighty acres or more of farm or ranch land for
agricultural purposes. Only a person who is a qualifying landowner or
leaseholder or a member of such person's immediate family may apply for a
limited permit. An applicant may apply for no more than one permit per
species per year except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section and the rules and regulations of the commission. For purposes of
this section, member of a person's immediate family means and is limited
to the spouse of such person, any child or stepchild of such person or of
the spouse of such person, any spouse of any such child or stepchild, any
grandchild or stepgrandchild of such person or of the spouse of such
person, any spouse of such grandchild or stepgrandchild, any sibling of
such person sharing ownership in the property, and any spouse of any such
sibling.
(b) The conditions applicable to permits issued pursuant to sections
37-447 to 37-450, 37-452, 37-456, or 37-457, whichever is appropriate,
shall apply to limited permits issued pursuant to this section, except
that the commission may pass commission orders for species harvest
allocation pertaining to the sex and age of the species harvested which
are different for a limited permit than for other hunting permits. For
purposes of this section, white-tailed deer and mule deer shall be
treated as one species.
(3)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt deer or antelope, the
applicant shall be a Nebraska resident who (i) owns or leases eighty
acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or a member
of such person's immediate family or (ii) is the partner, officer,
shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a
partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and
regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a member of the
immediate family of the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary.
The number of limited permits issued annually per species for each farm
or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided
-3-

LB1232 LB1232
2026 2026
by eighty. The fee for a limited permit to hunt deer or antelope shall be
one-half the fee for the regular permit for such species.
(b) A nonresident of Nebraska who owns three hundred twenty acres or
more of farm or ranch land in the State of Nebraska for agricultural
purposes or a member of such person's immediate family may apply for a
limited deer or antelope permit. The number of limited permits issued
annually per species for each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total
acreage of the farm or ranch divided by three hundred twenty. The fee for
such a permit to hunt deer or antelope shall be one-half the fee for a
nonresident permit to hunt such species.
(c) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
providing for the issuance of an additional limited deer permit to a
qualified individual for the taking of a deer without antlers at a fee
equal to or less than the fee for the original limited permit.
(4)(a) In addition to any limited permit to hunt deer issued to a
qualifying landowner under subsection (3) of this section, the commission
shall issue up to eight limited permits to hunt deer during the three
days of Saturday through Monday immediately preceding the opening day of
firearm deer hunting season to any qualifying landowner meeting the
requirements of subdivision (b) of this subsection and designated members
of his or her immediate family. The fee for each permit issued under this
subsection shall be five dollars. Permits shall be issued subject to the
following:
(i) No more than eight permits may be issued per qualifying
landowner to the landowner or designated members of his or her immediate
family, except that no more than one permit shall be issued per person
for the qualifying landowner or any designated member of his or her
immediate family;
(ii) Of the eight permits that may be issued, no more than six
permits may be issued to persons who are younger than nineteen years of
age and no more than two permits may be issued to persons who are
-4-

LB1232 LB1232
2026 2026
nineteen years of age or older; and
(iii) For a Nebraska resident landowner, the number of permits
issued shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by
eighty, and for a nonresident landowner, the number of permits issued
shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by three
hundred twenty.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the qualifying criteria for a
Nebraska resident described in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (ii) of this
section and the ownership criteria for a nonresident of Nebraska
described in subdivision (3)(b) of this section apply.
(c) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this subsection.
(5)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt wild turkey, the
applicant shall be a Nebraska resident who (i) owns or leases eighty
acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or a member
of such person's immediate family or (ii) is the partner, officer,
shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a
partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and
regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a member of the
immediate family of the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary.
The number of limited permits issued annually per season for each farm or
ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by
eighty. An applicant may apply for no more than one limited permit per
season. The fee for a limited permit to hunt wild turkey shall be one-
half the fee for the regular permit to hunt wild turkey.
(b) A nonresident of Nebraska who owns three hundred twenty acres or
more of farm or ranch land in the State of Nebraska for agricultural
purposes or a member of such person's immediate family may apply for a
limited permit to hunt wild turkey. Only one limited wild turkey permit
per three hundred twenty acres may be issued annually for each wild
turkey season under this subdivision. The fee for such a permit to hunt
-5-

LB1232 LB1232
2026 2026
shall be one-half the fee for a nonresident permit to hunt wild turkey.
(6)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt elk, (i) the
applicant shall be (A) a Nebraska resident who owns three hundred twenty
acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes, or is the
partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the
qualifying landowner by a partnership, corporation, or trust as provided
in the rules and regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section,
(B) a Nebraska resident who leases six hundred forty acres or more of
farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or has a combined total of
six hundred forty leased and owned acres of farm or ranch land used for
agricultural purposes, or is the partner, officer, shareholder, or
beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership,
corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations under
subdivision (2)(a) of this section, (C) a nonresident of Nebraska who
owns at least one thousand two hundred eighty acres of farm or ranch land
for agricultural purposes, or is the partner, officer, shareholder, or
beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership,
corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations under
subdivision (2)(a) of this section, or (D) a member of such owner's or
lessee's immediate family and (ii) the qualifying farm or ranch land of
the applicant shall be within an area designated as an elk management
zone by the commission in its rules and regulations.
(b) An applicant shall not be issued a limited bull elk permit more
than once every three years, and the commission may give preference to a
person who did not receive a limited elk permit or a specified type of
limited elk permit during the previous years.
(c) The fee for a resident landowner limited permit to hunt elk
shall not exceed one-half the fee for the regular permit to hunt elk. The
fee for a nonresident landowner limited permit to hunt elk shall not
exceed three times the cost of a resident elk permit.
(d) The number of applications allowed for limited elk permits for
-6-

LB1232 LB1232
2026 2026
each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or
ranch divided by the minimum acreage requirements established for the
property. No more than one person may qualify for the same described
property.
(7)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt mountain lions, (i)
the applicant shall be (A) a Nebraska resident who owns three hundred
twenty acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes, or
is the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary designated as the
qualifying landowner by a partnership, corporation, or trust as provided
in the rules and regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section,
(B) a Nebraska resident who leases six hundred forty acres or more of
farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or has a combined total of
six hundred forty leased and owned acres of farm or ranch land used for
agricultural purposes, or is the partner, officer, shareholder, or
beneficiary designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership,
corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations under
subdivision (2)(a) of this section, or (C) a member of such owner's or
lessee's immediate family and (ii) the qualifying farm or ranch land of
the applicant shall be within an area designated as a mountain lion
management zone by the commission in its rules and regulations.
(b) The commission may give preference to a person who did not
receive a limited mountain lion permit during the previous years.
(c) The application fee for a resident landowner limited permit to
hunt mountain lions shall not exceed one-half the application fee for the
regular permit to hunt mountain lions.
(d) The number of applications allowed for limited mountain lion
permits for each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the
farm or ranch divided by the minimum acreage requirements established for
the property. No more than one person may qualify for the same described
property.
Sec. 2. Section 37-456, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-7-

LB1232 LB1232
2026 2026
2024, is amended to read:
37-456 The issuance of limited antelope permits pursuant to section
37-455 in any management unit shall not exceed seventy-five percent of
the regular permits authorized for such antelope management unit. The
issuance of limited elk permits pursuant to section 37-455 in any
management unit shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the regular
permits authorized for such elk management unit. The issuance of limited
mountain lion permits pursuant to section 37-455 in any management unit
shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the regular permits authorized
for such mountain lion management unit.
Sec. 3. Original section 37-456, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 37-455, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
-8-